dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
    <pardef n="f/ader__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>adern</l><r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ader</l><r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>äderna</l><r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>äder</l><r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="toff/el__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>lorna</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>el</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>la</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>lan</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eln</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>lor</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="viby-i__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S:-__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S:-__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="amaryll/is__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>isen</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>is</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>isarna</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>isar</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>is</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="facit__n_un">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ly__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="komposit/um__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="todd/y__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yn</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ar</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yar</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yarna</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>arna</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tok/er__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>rar</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ar</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rarna</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>arna</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ern</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="s"><i>s</i><par n="s__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="toker"><i>tok</i><par n="tok/er__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="landsfader"><i>landsf</i><par n="f/ader__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="örtte"><i>örtte</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="urfader"><i>urf</i><par n="f/ader__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="vasker"><i>vask</i><par n="tok/er__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="kli"><i>kli</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kleresi"><i>kleresi</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="snasker"><i>snask</i><par n="tok/er__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="kucku"><i>kucku</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="bärsärkaraseri"><i>bärsärkaraseri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ändträ"><i>ändträ</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="tomtjobberi"><i>tomtjobberi</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="snusker"><i>snusk</i><par n="tok/er__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="toddy"><i>todd</i><par n="todd/y__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="facit"><i>facit</i><par n="facit__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="fritänkeri"><i>fritänkeri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="fjäsker"><i>fjäsk</i><par n="tok/er__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="slöseri"><i>slöseri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="fylleri"><i>fylleri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="fader"><i>f</i><par n="f/ader__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="pryderi"><i>pryderi</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="sjasker"><i>sjask</i><par n="tok/er__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="raseri"><i>raseri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="skådespeleri"><i>skådespeleri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="renommé"><i>renommé</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="epigoneri"><i>epigoneri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kamaraderi"><i>kamaraderi</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="vallhö"><i>vallhö</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="lärofader"><i>lärof</i><par n="f/ader__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="fältartilleri"><i>fältartilleri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ly"><i>ly</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="uranbly"><i>uranbly</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="rytteri"><i>rytteri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="läseri"><i>läseri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="lindblomste"><i>lindblomste</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="spelevinker"><i>spelevink</i><par n="tok/er__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="slarver"><i>slarv</i><par n="tok/er__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="gry"><i>gry</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="böjträ"><i>böjträ</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="mångsyssleri"><i>mångsyssleri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="fnasker"><i>fnask</i><par n="tok/er__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="lamellträ"><i>lamellträ</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="slaveri"><i>slaveri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="filttoffel"><i>filttoff</i><par n="toff/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="djurplågeri"><i>djurplågeri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="vågmästeri"><i>vågmästeri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="pojkvasker"><i>pojkvask</i><par n="tok/er__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="körsbärsträ"><i>körsbärsträ</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="visper"><i>visp</i><par n="tok/er__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="amaryllis"><i>amaryll</i><par n="amaryll/is__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="gnideri"><i>gnideri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="nyponte"><i>nyponte</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="anfader"><i>anf</i><par n="f/ader__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="kompositum"><i>komposit</i><par n="komposit/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="schå"><i>schå</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="viby-i"><i>viby-i</i><par n="viby-i__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="blankettraseri"><i>blankettraseri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="förfader"><i>förf</i><par n="f/ader__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="toffel"><i>toff</i><par n="toff/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="badtoffel"><i>badtoff</i><par n="toff/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="mångleri"><i>mångleri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="larver"><i>larv</i><par n="tok/er__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="mångguderi"><i>mångguderi</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kyrkofader"><i>kyrkof</i><par n="f/ader__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="pojkfnasker"><i>pojkfnask</i><par n="tok/er__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="vetekli"><i>vetekli</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="trätoffel"><i>trätoff</i><par n="toff/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="äggtoddy"><i>äggtodd</i><par n="todd/y__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bergsartilleri"><i>bergsartilleri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="bly"><i>bly</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ättefader"><i>ättef</i><par n="f/ader__n_ut"/></e>
